District of Columbia statutes.
47-122

Checks to be countersigned.

The Auditor of the District of Columbia shall continue to prepare and countersign all checks issued by the Disbursing Officer, and no check involving disbursement of public moneys by the Disbursing Officer shall be valid unless countersigned by the Auditor of the District of Columbia.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 592, ch. 1352
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-122.
1973 Ed., § 47-121.
Disbursing Office abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-111.